District of Columbia statutes.
45-301

Established; composition; term of office; residency requirement; vacancies; compensation; requests for information; power to enter into contracts.

(a)

There is established as an advisory body to the Council of the District of Columbia the District of Columbia Law Revision Commission (“Commission”), which shall be composed of 9 members, as follows:

(1)

Four members appointed by the Council of the District of Columbia;

(2)

Two members appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia;

(3)

Two members appointed by Joint Committee on Judicial Administration in the District of Columbia; and

(4)

The Attorney General of the District of Columbia, or his or her designee.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

No person may be appointed as a member of the Commission after the effective date of this chapter unless he or she is a bona fide resident of the District of Columbia who has maintained an actual place of abode in the District of Columbia for at least 90 days immediately prior to his or her appointment to the Commission.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

Members of the Commission shall serve for 4-year terms and may be reappointed for no more than 2 consecutive terms.

(f)

The Chairman of the Commission shall be selected by the members of the Commission from among their number.

(g)

Appointments to fill vacancies on the Commission shall be made in the same manner, and on the same basis, as original appointments to the Commission. A member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve until the expiration of the term of the member whose vacancy he or she was appointed to fill.

(h)

Each member of the Commission shall serve without compensation; provided, that each member may be reimbursed for actual expenses pursuant to § 1-611.08.

(i)

The Commission may request from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the executive branch of the District of Columbia or federal government, including independent agencies, any information necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Each department, agency, instrumentality, or independent agency of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed, to the extent permitted by law, to furnish the Commission the requested information.

(j)

Repealed.

(k)

The Commission may establish such advisory groups, committees, or subcommittees, consisting of members or nonmembers, as it deems necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Feb. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 3-119, § 2, 27 DCR 5641
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 70, 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(f), 53 DCR 6794
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 222, 62 DCR 1884

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 49-401.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (a)(4), validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 rewrote (a) and (h); repealed (b), (d), and (j); and deleted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section” from the beginning of (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 222 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 222 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

References in Text

The District of Columbia Law Revision Commission Act, referred to throughout this section, is the Act of August 21, 1974, 88 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 93-379, D.C. Law 3-119, codified as § 1-604.06 and this chapter.

Editor's Notes

Appropriations: The District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1992, Pub. L. 102-111, contained no appropriation for the Law Revision Commission and subsequent appropriations acts have not restored any appropriation.